California, session 20252026, AB400.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13514.7 is added to the Penal Code, to read:13514.7. (a) On or before July 1, 2028, the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training shall study and issue recommendations to the Legislature on the use of canines by law enforcement. The commission shall consider all of the following in its recommendations:(1) The use of canines by law enforcement personnel is of important concern to the community and law enforcement and law enforcement should safeguard the life, dignity, and liberty of all persons, without prejudice to anyone.(2) Officers shall carry out duties, including use of force with respect to canines, in a manner that is fair and unbiased.(3) Instances of appropriate patrol use with a canine, including standards for obedience, search, apprehension, and handler protection.(4) Instances of appropriate use with a canine for detection, including standards for control, alert, and odor detection.(5) Factors for evaluating and reviewing all canine use of force incidents.(6) Other considerations that will keep the public, the handler, and the canine safe, including how to provide a warning to a suspect within a deployment area upon the potential release of a canine.(b) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on July 1, 2031.